Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.072

Refund of fees or other payments collected by state.

Whenever any law which provides for the collection of fees or other payments by a state agency does not authorize the refund of erroneous or excessive payments thereof, refunds may be made or authorized by the state agency which collected the fees or payments of all such amounts received by the state agency in consequence of error, either of fact or of law as to: (1) The proper amount of such fee or payments; (2) The necessity of making or securing a permit, filing, examination or inspection; (3) The sufficiency of the credentials of an applicant; (4) The eligibility of an applicant for any other reason; (5) The necessity for the payment.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.072. Prior: 1955 c 224 s 1.]

NOTES:

Refunds of fees or other payments, budget and accounting system: RCW 43.88.170.